New York, session 2025-2026, A6740.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 503 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 548 of the laws of 1986 and paragraph (i) as 3 amended by chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 3. Waiver of fee. The commissioner may waive the payment of fees 6 required by subdivision two of this section if the applicant: 7 (i) is an incarcerated individual in an institution under the juris- 8 diction of a state department or agency, [or] 9 (ii) is a victim of crime and the driver's license or learner's permit 10 applied for is a replacement for one that was lost or destroyed as a 11 result of the crime, or 12 (iii) is applying for the replacement driver's license solely for the 13 purpose of designating on the applicant's driver's license that the 14 applicant is an organ donor. 15 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 491 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 16 amended by section 2 of part Q of chapter 58 of the laws of 2022, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 3. Waiver of fee. The commissioner may waive the payment of fees 19 required by subdivision two of this section if the applicant is: 20 (a) an incarcerated individual in an institution or correctional 21 facility under the jurisdiction of a state department or agency[, or]; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07568-01-5 A. 6740 2 1 (b) a victim of a crime and the identification card applied for is a 2 replacement for one that was lost or destroyed as a result of the crime; 3 or 4 (c) is applying for the replacement identification card solely for the 5 purpose of designating on the applicant's identification card that the 6 applicant is an organ donor. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.